Ohio, session 136, HB121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 4929.181 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 4929.181. (A) As used in this section, "renewable 6
natural gas" means biologically derived methane gas as defined 7
in section 5713.30 of the Revised Code that has been processed, 8
cleaned, or conditioned to remove or reduce nonmethane elements 9
to meet pipeline-quality fuel standards. 10
(B) Any producer of renewable natural gas that does not 11
have the on-site capability to inject renewable natural gas into 12
a natural gas transmission or distribution pipeline shall not be 13
considered a public utility. 14